Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.115

Licenses—Denial, suspension, revocation, modification.

This section governs the denial of an application for a license or the suspension, revocation, or modification of a license by the department. This section does not govern actions taken under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(1) The department shall give written notice of the denial of an application for a license to the applicant or his or her agent. The department shall give written notice of revocation, suspension, or modification of a license to the licensee or his or her agent. The notice shall state the reasons for the action. The notice shall be personally served in the manner of service of a summons in a civil action or shall be given in another manner that shows proof of receipt.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and in subsection (4) of this section, revocation, suspension, or modification is effective twenty-eight days after the licensee or the agent receives the notice.

(a) The department may make the date the action is effective later than twenty-eight days after receipt. If the department does so, it shall state the effective date in the written notice given the licensee or agent.

(b) The department may make the date the action is effective sooner than twenty-eight days after receipt when necessary to protect the public health, safety, or welfare. When the department does so, it shall state the effective date and the reasons supporting the effective date in the written notice given to the licensee or agent.

(c) When the department has received certification pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW from the department of social and health services that the licensee is a person who is not in compliance with a child support order or *an order from a court stating that the licensee is in noncompliance with a residential or visitation order under chapter 26.09 RCW, the department shall provide that the suspension is effective immediately upon receipt of the suspension notice by the licensee.

(3) Except for licensees suspended for noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or noncompliance with a *residential or visitation order under chapter 26.09 RCW, a license applicant or licensee who is aggrieved by a department denial, revocation, suspension, or modification has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is governed by the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The application must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the adverse action, include a copy of the adverse notice, be served on and received by the department within twenty-eight days of the license applicant's or licensee's receiving the adverse notice, and be served in a manner that shows proof of receipt.

(4)(a) If the department gives a licensee twenty-eight or more days notice of revocation, suspension, or modification and the licensee files an appeal before its effective date, the department shall not implement the adverse action until the final order has been entered. The presiding or reviewing officer may permit the department to implement part or all of the adverse action while the proceedings are pending if the appellant causes an unreasonable delay in the proceeding, if the circumstances change so that implementation is in the public interest, or for other good cause.

(b) If the department gives a licensee less than twenty-eight days notice of revocation, suspension, or modification and the licensee timely files a sufficient appeal, the department may implement the adverse action on the effective date stated in the notice. The presiding or reviewing officer may order the department to stay implementation of part or all of the adverse action while the proceedings are pending if staying implementation is in the public interest or for other good cause.

[ 1997 c 58 s 843; 1991 c 3 s 377.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 58 s 886 requiring a court to order certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were vetoed. See RCW 74.20A.320.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.